test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-jaeaemae53_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - `jäämä: # Verb (53) `jäämä 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     jäämä+V+Inf/mA: jäämä
     jäämä+V+Inf: jäiäq
     jäämä+V+Act+PrfPrc: jäänüq
     jäämä+V+Pss+PrfPrc: [jääd, jäädü]

     jäämä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jää
     jäämä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [jäät, jäädeq]
     jäämä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [jääs, jääse]
     jäämä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: jäämiq
     jäämä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: jäätiq
     jäämä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [jääseq, jääväq]
     jäämä+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII: jää
     jäämä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [jäi, jäie]
     jäämä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [jäit, jäiet, jäideq, jäiedeq, jäiq, jäieq]
     jäämä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [jäi, jäie]
     jäämä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [jäimiq, jäiemiq]
     jäämä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [jäitiq, jäietiq]
     jäämä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [jäiq, jäieq, jäiväq, jäieväq]

     jäämä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jäiäs

     jäämä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: jäävä

     jäämä+V+Jus: jääguq
